nl: Drum multiklem klemtype: Inclusief memorylock; Multiklem (dubbele klem); Multi-naar-multiklem; Multi-naar-rackklem; Multi-naar-rodklem; Haakse klem; Draaibare klem; T-klem; X-klem/kruisklem; Anders
fr: Type de pince de la multipince de batterie: Bague mémoire incluse; Pince multiple (double pince); Pince multiple à multiple; Pince multiple pour rack; Pince multiple pour tige; Pince à angle droit; Pince pivotante; Pince en T; Pince en X / pince croisée; Autre
da: Tromle-multiklemmens klemmetype: Memory lock medfølger; Multiklemme (dobbeltklemme); Multi-til-multi-klemme; Multi-til-rack-klemme; Multi-til-stang-klemme; Retvinklet klemme; Drejeklemme; T-klemme; X-klemme / krydsklemme; Anden
ru: Тип зажима многозажимного держателя: Мемори-лок в комплекте; Мульти-зажим (двойной); Мульти-зажим; Зажим на раму; Зажим на стержень; Прямоугольный зажим; Поворотный зажим; Т-образный зажим; Х-образный/перекрестный зажим; Другое
el: Τύπος σφιγκτήρα «πολλαπλών σφιγκτήρων» τυμπάνου: Περιλαμβάνεται κλείδωμα μνήμης; Πολυσφιγκτήρας (διπλός σφιγκτήρας); Πολυσφιγκτήρας σε πολυσφιγκτήρα; Πολυσφιγκτήρας σε rack; Πολυσφιγκτήρας σε ράβδο; Ορθογώνιος σφιγκτήρας; Περιστρεφόμενος σφιγκτήρας; Σφιγκτήρας T; Σφιγκτήρας X / σταυρωτός σφιγκτήρας; Άλλο
zh-CN: 鼓用多向夹具类型: 含记忆锁; 多功能夹（双夹）; 多功能对多功能夹; 多功能对支架夹; 多功能对连杆夹; 直角夹; 旋转夹; T 型夹; X 型夹/十字夹; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de clemă cu cleme multiple pentru tobe.: Inel de memorie inclus; Clemă multiplă (clemă dublă); Clemă multiplă la multiplă; Clemă multiplă la rack; Clemă multiplă la tijă; Clemă în unghi drept; Clemă pivotantă; Clemă în T; Clemă în X / clemă încrucișată; Altele
en: Drum multi-clamp clamp type: Memory lock included; Multi-clamp (double clamp); Multi-to-multi clamp; Multi-to-rack clamp; Multi-to-rod clamp; Right-angle clamp; Swivel clamp; T-clamp; X-clamp / cross clamp; Other
es: Tipo de abrazadera múltiple para tambor: Bloqueo de memoria incluido; Abrazadera múltiple (doble abrazadera); Abrazadera múltiple a múltiple; Abrazadera múltiple a rack; Abrazadera múltiple a varilla; Abrazadera en ángulo recto; Abrazadera giratoria; Abrazadera en T; Abrazadera en X / abrazadera cruzada; Otro
cs: Typ multiclampu pro bicí: Včetně paměťové objímky; Multisvorka (dvojitá svorka); Svorka multi-multi; Svorka multi-rampa; Svorka multi-tyč; Pravoúhlá svorka; Otočná svorka; T-svorka; X-svorka / křížová svorka; Ostatní
sk-SK: Typ svorky s viacerými svorkami na bubon: Pamäťový zámok je súčasťou balenia; Viacúčelová svorka (dvojitá svorka); Viacúčelová svorka na viacero komponentov; Viacúčelová svorka na rampu; Viacúčelová svorka na tyč; Pravouhlá svorka; Otočná svorka; T-svorka; X-svorka / krížová svorka; Iné
ko: 드럼 멀티 클램프 클램프 유형: 메모리 락 포함; 멀티 클램프 (더블 클램프); 멀티 대 멀티 클램프; 멀티 대 랙 클램프; 멀티 대 로드 클램프; 직각 클램프; 스위블 클램프; T 클램프; X 클램프/크로스 클램프; 기타
bg-BG: Тип на скобата при мултискоба за барабани.: Включен мемори ключ; Мулти-скоба (двойна скоба); Скоба мулти към мулти; Скоба мулти към рамка; Скоба мулти към прът; Правоъгълна скоба; Въртяща скоба; Т-образна скоба; X-образна скоба / кръстосана скоба; Друго
hu: Többfunkciós dobszorító típus: Memóriazárral; Többszörös bilincs (kettős bilincs); Multi-to-multi bilincs; Multi-to-rack bilincs; Multi-to-rod bilincs; Derékszögű bilincs; Forgócsuklós bilincs; T-bilincs; X-bilincs / keresztbilincs; Egyéb
tr: Davul çoklu kelepçe türü: Hafıza kilidi dahil; Çoklu kelepçe (çift kelepçe); Çokludan çokluya kelepçe; Çokludan rafa kelepçe; Çokludan çubuğa kelepçe; Dik açılı kelepçe; Döner kelepçe; T kelepçe; X kelepçe / çapraz kelepçe; Diğer
zh-TW: 鼓用多功能夾具類型: 含記憶鎖; 多功能夾 (雙夾); 多對多夾; 多對支架夾; 多對桿夾; 直角夾; 旋轉夾; T 型夾; X 型夾 / 十字夾; 其他
pl: Typ zacisku multiclampa perkusyjnego: Z pamięcią ustawienia (memory lock); Multiclamp (zacisk podwójny); Zacisk multi-do-multi; Zacisk multi-do-ramy; Zacisk multi-do-pręta; Zacisk kątowy; Zacisk obrotowy; Zacisk typu T; Zacisk typu X / krzyżowy; Inny
it: Morsetto a tamburo multi-morsetto tipo: Memory lock incluso; Morsetto multiplo (doppio morsetto); Morsetto multiplo-multiplo; Morsetto da multiplo a rack; Morsetto da multiplo ad asta; Morsetto ad angolo retto; Morsetto girevole; Morsetto a T; Morsetto a X / morsetto a croce; Altro
fi: Rumpujen monitoimipuristimen kiinnitystyyppi: Sisältää muistilukon; Monikiristin (kaksoiskiristin); Multi-to-multi-kiristin; Multi-to-rack-kiristin; Multi-to-rod-kiristin; Suorakulmakiristin; Nivelkiristin; T-kiristin; X-kiristin / ristikiristin; Muu
th: ประเภทแคลมป์ในอุปกรณ์ Multi-Clamp สำหรับกลอง: รวมเมมโมรีล็อก; แคลมป์อเนกประสงค์ (แคลมป์คู่); แคลมป์ยึดอเนกประสงค์แบบหลายด้าน; แคลมป์ยึดอเนกประสงค์กับชั้นวาง; แคลมป์ยึดอเนกประสงค์กับก้าน; แคลมป์มุมฉาก; แคลมป์แบบหมุนได้; แคลมป์รูปตัว T; แคลมป์รูปตัว X / แคลมป์ไขว้; อื่นๆ
de: Typ der Mehrfachklemme für Trommeln: Inklusive Memory Lock; Multiklammer (Doppelklammer); Multi-zu-Multi-Klammer; Multi-zu-Rack-Klammer; Multi-zu-Rod-Klammer; Winkelklammer; Drehklammer; T-Klammer; X-Klammer / Kreuzklammer; Sonstige
sv: Typ av flerklämma för trummor: Minneslås ingår; Multiklämma (dubbel klämma); Multi-till-multi-klämma; Multi-till-rack-klämma; Multi-till-stav-klämma; Vinkelklämma; Vridbar klämma; T-klämma; X-klämma/korsklämma; Övrigt
pt-PT: tipo de braçadeira multi-clamp para tambor: Bloqueio de memória incluído; Multigrampo (grampo duplo); Grampo multi a multi; Grampo multi a rack; Grampo multi a haste; Grampo de ângulo reto; Grampo giratório; Grampo em T; Grampo em X/grampo cruzado; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de fixação com várias braçadeiras para tambores de bateria: Trava de memória incluída; Multiclamps (abraçadeira dupla); Braçadeira multi para multi; Braçadeira multi para rack; Braçadeira multi para haste; Braçadeira em ângulo reto; Braçadeira giratória; Braçadeira em T; Braçadeira em X / braçadeira cruzada; Outra
hr-HR: Vrsta stezaljke za bubanj s više stezaljki: Uključena memorijska brava; Višestruka stezaljka (dvostruka stezaljka); Višestruka na višestruku stezaljka; Višestruka na okvir (rack) stezaljka; Višestruka na šipku stezaljka; Pravokutna stezaljka; Okretna stezaljka; T-stezaljka; X-stezaljka / križna stezaljka; Ostalo
vi: Loại kẹp đa năng của trống: Bao gồm khóa ghi nhớ; Kẹp đa năng (kẹp đôi); Kẹp nối đa năng; Kẹp nối với giá; Kẹp nối với thanh; Kẹp góc vuông; Kẹp xoay; Kẹp chữ T; Kẹp chữ X / kẹp chéo; Khác
lt-LT: Būgnų daugiafunkcio spaustuko spaustuko tipas: Pridedamas atminties užraktas; Daugiafunkcis spaustukas (dvigubas spaustukas); Daugiafunkcis jungiamasis spaustukas; Daugiafunkcis stelažo spaustukas; Daugiafunkcis strypo spaustukas; Stataus kampo spaustukas; Pasukamas spaustukas; T formos spaustukas; X formos spaustukas / kryžminis spaustukas; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta objemke z več objemkami za boben: Vključena spominska objemka; Večnamenska sponka (dvojna sponka); Večkratna sponka (multi-to-multi); Sponka za ogrodje (multi-to-rack); Sponka za palico (multi-to-rod); Pravokotna sponka; Vrtljiva sponka; T-sponka; X-sponka/križna sponka; Drugo
nb: Trommel multiklemme klemmetype: Minnelås inkludert; Multiklemme (dobbel klemme); Multi-til-multi-klemme; Multi-til-rack-klemme; Multi-til-stang-klemme; Rettvinklet klemme; Svingklemme; T-klemme; X-klemme / kryssklemme; Annet
ja: ドラムマルチクランプクランプタイプ: メモリーロック付き; マルチクランプ (ダブルクランプ); マルチトゥマルチクランプ; マルチトゥラッククランプ; マルチトゥロッドクランプ; 直角クランプ; スイベルクランプ; Tクランプ; Xクランプ / クロスクランプ; その他